Utah statutes.
10-18-302.   Bonding authority.
(1)  In accordance with Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act,
the legislative body of a municipality may by resolution determine to issue
one or more revenue bonds or general obligation bonds to finance the capital
costs for facilities necessary to provide to subscribers:
(a)  a cable television service; or
(b)  a public telecommunications service.
(2)  The resolution described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  describe the purpose for which the indebtedness is to be created; and
(b)  specify the dollar amount of the one or more bonds proposed to be issued.
(3) (a)  A revenue bond issued under this section shall be secured and paid
for:
(i)  from the revenues generated by the municipality from providing:
(A)  cable television services with respect to revenue bonds issued to finance
facilities for the municipality's cable television services; and
(B)  public telecommunications services with respect to revenue bonds issued
to finance facilities for the municipality's public telecommunications
services; and
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (3)(b) and Subsection 10-18-303(3)(a), from
revenues generated under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, if:
(A)  notwithstanding Subsection 11-14-201(3) and except as provided in
Subsections (4) and (5), the revenue bond is approved by the registered voters
in an election held:
(I)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A)(II), pursuant to the
provisions of Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, that govern
bond elections; and
(II)  notwithstanding Subsection 11-14-203(2), at a regular general election;
(B)  the revenues described in this Subsection (3)(a)(ii) are pledged as
security for the revenue bond; and
(C)  the municipality or municipalities annually appropriate the revenues
described in this Subsection (3)(a)(ii) to secure and pay the revenue bond
issued under this section.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii), a municipality may not pay
the origination, financing, or other carrying costs associated with the one or
more revenue bonds issued under this section from the general funds or other
enterprise funds of the municipality.
(4) (a)  As used in this Subsection (4), "municipal entity" means an entity
created pursuant to an agreement:
(i)  under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act; and
(ii)  to which a municipality is a party.
(b)  The requirements of Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A) do not apply to a
municipality or municipal entity that issues revenue bonds, or to a
municipality that is a member of a municipal entity that issues revenue bonds,
if:
(i)  on or before March 2, 2004, the municipality that is issuing revenue
bonds or that is a member of a municipal entity that is issuing revenue bonds
has published the first notice described in Subsection (4)(b)(iii);
(ii)  on or before April 15, 2004, the municipality that is issuing revenue
bonds or that is a member of a municipal entity that is issuing revenue bonds
makes the decision to pledge the revenues described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)
as security for the revenue bonds described in this Subsection (4)(b)(ii);
(iii)  the municipality that is issuing the revenue bonds or the municipality
that is a member of the municipal entity that is issuing the revenue bonds
has:
(A)  held a public hearing for which public notice was given by publication of
the notice:
(I)  in a newspaper published in the municipality or in a newspaper of general
circulation within the municipality for two consecutive weeks, with the first
publication being not less than 14 days before the public hearing; and
(II)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks before the public
hearing; and
(B)  the notice identifies:
(I)  that the notice is given pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 14, Local
Government Bonding Act;
(II)  the purpose for the bonds to be issued;
(III)  the maximum amount of the revenues described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)
that will be pledged in any fiscal year;
(IV)  the maximum number of years that the pledge will be in effect; and
(V)  the time, place, and location for the public hearing;
(iv)  the municipal entity that issues revenue bonds:
(A)  adopts a final financing plan; and
(B)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act, makes available to the public at the time the municipal entity
adopts the final financing plan:
(I)  the final financing plan; and
(II)  all contracts entered into by the municipal entity, except as protected
by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;
(v)  any municipality that is a member of a municipal entity described in
Subsection (4)(b)(iv):
(A)  not less than 30 calendar days after the municipal entity complies with
Subsection (4)(b)(iv)(B), holds a final public hearing;
(B)  provides notice, at the time the municipality schedules the final public
hearing, to any person who has provided to the municipality a written request
for notice; and
(C)  makes all reasonable efforts to provide fair opportunity for oral
testimony by all interested parties; and
(vi)  except with respect to a municipality that issued bonds prior to March
1, 2004, not more than 50% of the average annual debt service of all revenue
bonds described in this section to provide service throughout the municipality
or municipal entity may be paid from the revenues described in Subsection
(3)(a)(ii).
(5)  On or after July 1, 2007, the requirements of Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A) do
not apply to a municipality that issues revenue bonds if:
(a)  the municipality that is issuing the revenue bonds has:
(i)  held a public hearing for which public notice was given by publication of
the notice in a newspaper published in the municipality or in a newspaper of
general circulation within the municipality for two consecutive weeks, with
the first publication being not less than 14 days before the public hearing;
and
(ii)  the notice identifies:
(A)  that the notice is given pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 14, Local
Government Bonding Act;
(B)  the purpose for the bonds to be issued;
(C)  the maximum amount of the revenues described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)
that will be pledged in any fiscal year;
(D)  the maximum number of years that the pledge will be in effect; and
(E)  the time, place, and location for the public hearing; and
(b)  except with respect to a municipality that issued bonds prior to March 1,
2004, not more than 50% of the average annual debt service of all revenue
bonds described in this section to provide service throughout the municipality
or municipal entity may be paid from the revenues described in Subsection
(3)(a)(ii).
(6)  A municipality that issues bonds pursuant to this section may not make or
grant any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to itself or to any
private provider of:
(a)  cable television services; or
(b)  public telecommunications services.
